Maryland, session 2026, HB0119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
11–101.
(a) In this Division II the following words have the meanings indicated unless:
(1) the context clearly requires a different meaning; or
(2) a different definition is provided for a particular title or provision.
(i) “Energy performance contract” means an agreement for the provision of
energy services, including electricity, heating, ventilation, cooling, steam, or hot water, in
which a person agrees to design, install, finance, maintain, or manage energy systems or
equipment to improve the energy efficiency of a building or facility in exchange for a portion
of the energy savings.
12–302.
(a) The Department of General Services shall be responsible for monitoring the
status of active energy performance contracts and reporting that status to the Board
annually.
(b) A unit that has entered into an energy performance contract shall submit to
the Department of General Services for review any required annual measurement and
verification reports.
SUBTITLE 10. NAVIGATORS FOR ENERGY PERFORMANCE CONTRACTS.
17–1001.

HOUSE BILL 119 3
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ENERGY PERFORMANCE CONTRACT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
11–101 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(C) “NAVIGATOR” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO ASSISTS PUBLIC BODIES IN
CREATING ENERGY PERFORMANCE CONTRACTS.
(D) “PUBLIC BODY” INCLUDES:
(1) A UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT;
(2) A COUNTY;
(3) A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION;
(4) A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION;
(5) A LOCAL BOARD OF EDUCATION; AND
(6) A STATE OR LOCAL HOSPITAL.
17–1002.
(A) (1) A PUBLIC BODY THAT ENTERS INTO AN ENERGY PERFORMANCE
CONTRACT SHALL COMPLY WITH TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(2) BEFORE ENTERING INTO AN ENERGY PERFORMANCE CONTRACT
A PUBLIC BODY SHALL SUBMIT WRITTEN NOTIFICATION TO THE NAVIGATOR FOR
THE PUBLIC BODY’S REGION.
(B) (1) (I) THE MARYLAND CLEAN ENERGY CENTER SHALL HIRE OR
CONTRACT WITH NAVIGATORS TO ASSIST A PUBLIC BODY IN CREATING AN ENERGY
PERFORMANCE CONTRACT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(II) FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE
IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $1,500,000 FROM THE
STRATEGIC ENERGY INVESTMENT FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–20B–05 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE TO THE MARYLAND CLEAN ENERGY CENTER TO
HIRE OR CONTRACT WITH NAVIGATORS TO ASSIST PUBLIC BODIES IN CREATING AN
ENERGY PERFORMANCE CONTRACT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.

HOUSE BILL 119
(2) AT LEAST ONE NAVIGATOR SHALL ASSIST PUBLIC BODIES IN EACH
OF THE FOLLOWING REGIONS:
(I) ALLEGANY COUNTY, FREDERICK COUNTY, GARRETT
COUNTY, AND WASHINGTON COUNTY;
(II) CALVERT COUNTY, CHARLES COUNTY, AND ST. MARY’S
COUNTY;
(III) CAROLINE COUNTY, CECIL COUNTY, DORCHESTER
COUNTY, KENT COUNTY, QUEEN ANNE’S COUNTY, SOMERSET COUNTY, TALBOT
COUNTY, WICOMICO COUNTY, AND WORCESTER COUNTY;
(IV) ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY, CARROLL COUNTY, HARFORD
COUNTY, AND HOWARD COUNTY;
(V) MONTGOMERY COUNTY;
(VI) PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY;
(VII) BALTIMORE COUNTY; AND
(VIII) BALTIMORE CITY.
(C) AFTER RECEIVING NOTICE UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS
SECTION, A NAVIGATOR SHALL ASSIST A PUBLIC BODY WITH CREATING AN ENERGY
PERFORMANCE CONTRACT, INCLUDING:
(1) APPLYING FOR FEDERAL, STATE, OR OTHER GRANTS OR LOANS TO
CREATE OR EXECUTE ENERGY PERFORMANCE CONTRACTS;
(2) REVIEWING AND ESTABLISHING ENERGY EFFICIENCY MEASURES
TO REDUCE THE ENERGY COSTS OF A BUILDING;
(3) REVIEWING AND ESTABLISHING CLEAN ENERGY PROJECTS TO
REDUCE THE ENERGY COSTS OF A BUILDING; AND
(4) WORKING WITH THE MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION TO
APPLY FOR GRANTS OR LOANS UNDER THE JANE E. LAWTON CONSERVATION
GRANT AND LOAN PROGRAM.
Article – State Government
9–20A–01.

HOUSE BILL 119 5
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Administration” means the Maryland Energy Administration.
(c) “Borrower” means an eligible State agency, local jurisdiction, nonprofit
organization, or eligible business that applies and qualifies for a loan under this Program.
(d) “Eligible business” means a commercial enterprise or business that is in good
standing with the State Department of Assessments and Taxation and is:
(1) incorporated in the State; or
(2) registered to do business in the State.
(e) “Energy cost savings” means the actual reduction in operating expenses
resulting from the installation, operation, and maintenance of a project financed under the
Program.
(f) “Fund” means the Jane E. Lawton Conservation Fund.
(g) “GRANTEE” MEANS A PUBLIC BODY THAT APPLIES FOR A GRANT UNDER
THE PROGRAM.
(H) (1) “Local jurisdiction” means any county or municipality of the State.
(2) “Local jurisdiction” includes:
(i) a board of education of a county or municipality;
(ii) a special district that is established by State law and that
operates within a single county;
(iii) a special district that is established by a county under public
general law; and
(iv) an office, board, or department that is established in a county
under State law and that is funded, under State law, at least in part by the county
governing body.
[(h)] (I) “Municipality” means any municipal corporation in the State that is
subject to the provisions of Article XI–E of the Maryland Constitution or any duly
authorized agency or instrumentality of the municipality.

HOUSE BILL 119
[(i)] (J) “Nonprofit organization” means a corporation, foundation, school,
hospital, or other legal entity, no part of the net earnings of which inure to the benefit of
any private shareholder or individual holding an interest in the entity.
[(j)] (K) “Program” means the Jane E. Lawton Conservation GRANT AND Loan
Program.
[(k)] (L) “Project” means one or more improvements or modifications that
enhance the energy efficiency and reduce the operating expenses of a structure located in
Maryland.
(M) “PUBLIC BODY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 17–1001 OF THE STATE
FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
[(l)] (N) (1) “State agency” means any permanent or temporary State office,
department, division or unit, bureau, board, commission, task force, authority, institution,
State college or university, and any other unit of State government, whether executive,
legislative, or judicial.
(2) “State agency” includes any subunits of State government OR PUBLIC
BODY.
9–20A–02.
There is a Jane E. Lawton Conservation GRANT AND Loan Program in the
Administration.
9–20A–03.
The purpose of the Program is to provide financial assistance in the form of GRANTS
TO PUBLIC BODIES AND low interest and zero interest loans to nonprofit organizations,
local jurisdictions, State agencies, and eligible businesses for projects in order to:
(1) promote energy conservation;
(2) reduce consumption of fossil fuels;
(3) improve energy efficiency;
(4) enhance energy–related economic development and stability in the
nonprofit, commercial, and industrial sectors; and
(5) reduce greenhouse gas emissions.
9–20A–04.

HOUSE BILL 119 7
The Administration shall:
(1) manage, supervise, and administer the Program;
(2) adopt regulations to ensure that GRANTS AND loans are provided only
to projects that carry out the purpose of the Program;
(3) attach [specific terms] to any GRANT OR loan SPECIFIC TERMS that
are considered necessary to ensure that the purpose of the Program is fulfilled; [and]
(4) develop procedures for monitoring projects to assess whether the
improvements or modifications made by an eligible entity or business that had received a
GRANT OR loan under the Program have resulted in a measurable reduction in energy
consumption; AND
(5) WORK WITH NAVIGATORS IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 17–1002 OF
THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
9–20A–05.
(a) (1) To receive a GRANT OR loan under the Program, a GRANTEE OR
borrower must file an application with the Administration.
(2) If the borrower is an eligible business, the application must be signed
by the chief operating officer or an authorized officer of the business.
(3) If the GRANTEE OR borrower is a local jurisdiction, the application
must be signed by the chief elected officer of the county or municipality, or if none, by the
governing body of the county or municipality in which the project is located.
(4) If the GRANTEE OR borrower is a public school, the application must
be signed by the board of education of the county in which the project is located.
(5) If the GRANTEE OR borrower is a State agency, the application must
be signed by the head of the State agency.
(6) IF THE GRANTEE OR BORROWER IS A STATE HOSPITAL, THE
APPLICATION MUST BE SIGNED BY THE CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER OR PRESIDENT
OF THE HOSPITAL.
(b) The application shall contain any information the Administration determines
is necessary, including:
(1) the projected cost to accomplish a proposed project;

HOUSE BILL 119
(2) the amount of energy or fuel a proposed project is expected to save over
a defined period of time after completion of the project;
(3) the anticipated environmental benefits in the form of reduced emissions
or pollution attributable to the proposed project;
(4) the amount of cost savings expected to be generated over a defined
period of time after completion of the proposed project;
(5) a description of the borrower’s contribution to a proposed project as
required by § 9–20A–06 of this subtitle; and
(6) any additional information relating to the GRANTEE, borrower, or [the]
proposed project that may be required by the Administration in order to administer the
Program.
9–20A–06.
(a) Loans from the Fund may be used for:
(1) the costs of implementing projects, including the costs of all necessary:
(i) technical assessments;
(ii) studies;
(iii) surveys;
(iv) plans and specifications; and
(v) start–up, architectural, engineering, or other special services;
(2) the costs of procuring necessary technology, equipment, licenses, or
materials; and
(3) the costs of construction, rehabilitation, or modification, including the
purchase and installation of any necessary machinery, equipment, or furnishings.
(b) Each borrower shall make a contribution to a project that is of a type and
amount acceptable to the Administration.
(c) A borrower other than a State agency OR PUBLIC BODY must document that
the anticipated energy cost savings to the borrower over a defined period according to a
methodology acceptable to the Administration after the completion of the project are
greater than the total cost of the project to the borrower.

HOUSE BILL 119 9
(d) Loans made under the Program to a borrower other than a State agency OR
PUBLIC BODY shall:
(1) be repayable by the borrower from specified revenues that may include
the energy cost savings generated by a project;
(2) bear interest at a rate that the Administration determines to be
necessary and reasonable for the project; and
(3) be repayable in accordance with a schedule that the Administration
sets, which may be on a deferred payment basis.
(e) (1) A borrower other than a State agency OR PUBLIC BODY shall provide
assurances for the repayment of a loan.
(2) The assurances:
(i) shall include a promissory note; and
(ii) may include superior or subordinate mortgage liens, guarantees
of repayment, or other forms of collateral.
(f) Loans may be made in conjunction with, or in addition to, financial assistance
provided through other State or federal programs.
(G) (1) GRANTS MADE TO PUBLIC BODIES UNDER THE PROGRAM MAY BE
USED FOR:
(I) THE COSTS OF IMPLEMENTING PROJECTS, INCLUDING THE
COSTS OF ALL NECESSARY:
1. TECHNICAL ASSESSMENTS;
2. STUDIES;
3. SURVEYS;
4. PLANS AND SPECIFICATIONS; AND
5. START–UP, ARCHITECTURAL, ENGINEERING, OR
OTHER SPECIAL SERVICES;
(II) THE COSTS OF PROCURING NECESSARY TECHNOLOGY,
EQUIPMENT, LICENSES, OR MATERIALS; AND

HOUSE BILL 119
(III) THE COSTS OF CONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, OR
MODIFICATION, INCLUDING THE PURCHASE AND INSTALLATION OF ANY NECESSARY
MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, OR FURNISHINGS.
(2) GRANTS MAY BE AWARDED IN CONJUNCTION WITH, OR IN
ADDITION TO, FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PROVIDED THROUGH OTHER STATE OR
FEDERAL PROGRAMS.
(3) A RECIPIENT OF A GRANT AWARDED UNDER THE PROGRAM MAY
USE THE ENERGY COST SAVINGS ASSOCIATED WITH THE GRANT TO APPLY FOR
ADDITIONAL FEDERAL, STATE, OR PRIVATE PROGRAMS THAT ARE DESIGNED TO
INCREASE THE ENERGY EFFICIENCY OF A BUILDING OR ADD RENEWABLE ENERGY
TO A BUILDING.
(4) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL COORDINATE WITH THE
MARYLAND CLEAN ENERGY CENTER TO IMPLEMENT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS
SECTION.
9–20A–07.
(a) There is a Jane E. Lawton Conservation Fund.
(b) The Administration shall administer the Fund.
(c) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund and the Comptroller shall
account for the Fund.
(d) The Fund consists of:
(1) money appropriated in the State budget to the Program;
(2) money received from any public or private source;
(3) interest and investment earnings on the Fund; and
(4) repayments and prepayments of principal and interest on loans made
from the Fund.
(e) The Fund may be used only:
(1) to pay the expenses of the Program;

HOUSE BILL 119 11
(2) to provide GRANTS AND loans to GRANTEES, eligible borrowers, and
projects; and
(3) to enhance the credit of a financing offered by eligible banks and other
financial institutions for projects.
(f) (1) The State Treasurer shall invest and reinvest the money of the Fund in
the same manner as other State money may be invested.
(2) Any investment earnings of the Fund shall be paid into the Fund.
(3) Any repayment of principal and interest on loans made from the Fund
shall be paid into the Fund.
(g) (1) The Administration shall annually reserve for at least 90 days a portion
of the money from the Fund that is available for financial assistance under the Program for
GRANTS TO PUBLIC BODIES AND loans to nonprofit organizations.
(2) In a fiscal year in which requests for financial assistance from nonprofit
organizations are less than the amount of money reserved under paragraph (1) of this
subsection for the period determined by the Administration, the Administration may make
the unencumbered or noncommitted portion of the reserve available to other GRANTEES
OR borrowers in the Program.
9–20B–05.
(a) There is a Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund.
(f) The Administration shall use the Fund:
(13) notwithstanding subsection (g) of this section, to pay costs associated
with the Air and Radiation Administration within the Department of the Environment;
[and]
(14) TO PROVIDE FUNDING, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 17–1002 OF THE
STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, TO THE MARYLAND CLEAN ENERGY
CENTER TO HIRE OR CONTRACT WITH NAVIGATORS; AND
[(14)] (15) to pay the expenses of the Program.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.